Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2335.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 32, chapter 32, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 32-3230.03, to read: START_STATUTE32-3230.03. Vaccination status; unprofessional conduct It is an act of unprofessional conduct for a health professional to refuse to provide medical care to a person based on the person's vaccination status.END_STATUTE